Missouri, session 2026, SB1268.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 197.305, 197.315, 197.320, 197.366,
and 354.095, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 197.305, 197.315,
197.320, and 354.095, to read as follows:
197.305. As used in sections 197.300 to [197.366]
197.367, the following terms mean:
(1) "Affected persons", the person proposing the
development of a new institutional health service, the
public to be served, and health care facilities within the
service area in which the proposed new health care service
is to be developed;
(2) "Agency", the certificate of need program of the
Missouri department of health and senior services;
(3) "Capital expenditure", an expenditure by or on
behalf of a health care facility which, under generally
accepted accounting principles, is not properly chargeable
as an expense of operation and maintenance;
(4) "Certificate of need", a written certificate
issued by the committee setting forth the committee's
affirmative finding that a proposed project sufficiently
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1268 2
satisfies the criteria prescribed for such projects by
sections 197.300 to [197.366] 197.367;
(5) "Committee", the Missouri health facilities review
committee;
(6) "Department", the Missouri department of health
and senior services;
(7) "Develop", to undertake those activities which on
their completion will result in the offering of a new
institutional health service or the incurring of a financial
obligation in relation to the offering of such a service;
[(6)] (8) "Expenditure minimum" shall mean:
(a) For beds in existing or proposed health care
facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 198 and long-term
care beds in a hospital as described in subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 198.012, six hundred thousand
dollars in the case of capital expenditures[, or four
hundred thousand dollars in the case of major medical
equipment,]; provided, [however,] that prior to January 1,
2003, the expenditure minimum for beds in such a facility
and long-term care beds in a hospital described in section
198.012 shall be zero, subject to the provisions of
subsection 7 of section 197.318;
(b) For beds [or equipment] in a long-term care
hospital meeting the requirements described in 42 CFR[,
Section] 412.23(e), the expenditure minimum shall be zero;
and
(c) For health care facilities, new institutional
health services or beds not described in paragraph (a) or
(b) of this subdivision one million dollars in the case of
capital expenditures[, excluding major medical equipment,
and one million dollars in the case of medical equipment];
(9) "Health care facilities":

SB 1268 3
(a) Facilities licensed under chapter 198;
(b) Long-term care beds in a hospital, as described in
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 198.012; and
(c) Long-term care hospitals or beds in a long-term
care hospital meeting the requirements described in 42 CFR
412.23(e);
[(7)] (10) "Health service area", a geographic region
appropriate for the effective planning and development of
health services, determined on the basis of factors
including population and the availability of resources,
consisting of a population of not less than five hundred
thousand or more than three million;
[(8) "Major medical equipment", medical equipment used
for the provision of medical and other health services;
(9)] (11) "New institutional health service":
(a) The development of a new health care facility
costing in excess of the applicable expenditure minimum;
(b) The acquisition, including acquisition by lease,
of any health care facility[, or major medical equipment]
costing in excess of the expenditure minimum;
(c) Any capital expenditure by or on behalf of a
health care facility in excess of the expenditure minimum;
(d) Predevelopment activities [as defined in
subdivision (12) hereof] costing in excess of one hundred
fifty thousand dollars;
(e) Any change in licensed bed capacity of a health
care facility licensed under chapter 198 which increases the
total number of beds by more than ten or more than ten
percent of total bed capacity, whichever is less, over a two-
year period, provided that any such health care facility
seeking a nonapplicability review for an increase in total
beds or total bed capacity in an amount less than described

SB 1268 4
in this paragraph shall be eligible for such review only if
the facility has had no patient care class I deficiencies
within the last eighteen months and has maintained at least
an eighty-five percent average occupancy rate for the
previous six quarters;
(f) Health services, excluding home health services,
which are offered in a health care facility and which were
not offered on a regular basis in such health care facility
within the twelve-month period prior to the time such
services would be offered;
(g) A reallocation by an existing health care facility
of licensed beds among major types of service or
reallocation of licensed beds from one physical facility or
site to another by more than ten beds or more than ten
percent of total licensed bed capacity, whichever is less,
over a two-year period;
[(10)] (12) "Nonsubstantive projects", projects which
do not involve the addition, replacement, modernization or
conversion of beds or the provision of a new health service
100 but which include a capital expenditure which exceeds the
101 expenditure minimum and are due to an act of God or a normal
102 consequence of maintaining health care services, facility or
103 equipment;
104 [(11)] (13) "Person", any individual, trust, estate,
105 partnership, corporation, including associations and joint
106 stock companies, state or political subdivision or
107 instrumentality thereof, including a municipal corporation;
108 [(12)] (14) "Predevelopment activities", expenditures
109 for architectural designs, plans, working drawings and
110 specifications, and any arrangement or commitment made for
111 financing; but excluding submission of an application for a
112 certificate of need.

SB 1268 5
197.315. 1. Any person who proposes to develop or
offer a new institutional health service within the state
[must] shall obtain a certificate of need from the committee
prior to the time such services are offered.
2. Only those new institutional health services which
are found by the committee to be needed shall be granted a
certificate of need. Only those new institutional health
services which are granted certificates of need shall be
offered or developed within the state. No expenditures for
new institutional health services in excess of the
applicable expenditure minimum shall be made by any person
unless a certificate of need has been granted.
3. After October 1, 1980, no state agency charged by
statute to license or certify health care facilities shall
issue a license to or certify any such facility, or distinct
part of such facility, that is developed without obtaining a
certificate of need.
4. If any person proposes to develop any new
institutional health care service without a certificate of
need as required by sections 197.300 to [197.366] 197.367,
the committee shall notify the attorney general, and he
shall apply for an injunction or other appropriate legal
action in any court of this state against that person.
5. After October 1, 1980, no agency of state
government may appropriate or grant funds to or make payment
of any funds to any person or health care facility which has
not first obtained every certificate of need required
pursuant to sections 197.300 to [197.366] 197.367.
6. A certificate of need shall be issued only for the
premises and persons named in the application and is not
transferable except by consent of the committee.

SB 1268 6
7. Project cost increases, due to changes in the
project application as approved or due to project change
orders, exceeding the initial estimate by more than ten
percent shall not be incurred without consent of the
committee.
8. Periodic reports to the committee shall be required
of any applicant who has been granted a certificate of need
until the project has been completed. The committee may
order the forfeiture of the certificate of need upon failure
of the applicant to file any such report.
9. A certificate of need shall be subject to
forfeiture for failure to incur a capital expenditure on any
approved project within six months after the date of the
order. The applicant may request an extension from the
committee of not more than six additional months based upon
substantial expenditure made.
10. Each application for a certificate of need must be
accompanied by an application fee. The time of filing
commences with the receipt of the application and the
application fee. The application fee is one thousand
dollars, or one-tenth of one percent of the total cost of
the proposed project, whichever is greater. All application
fees shall be deposited in the state treasury. Because of
the loss of federal funds, the general assembly will
appropriate funds to the Missouri health facilities review
committee.
11. In determining whether a certificate of need
should be granted, no consideration shall be given to the
facilities [or equipment] of any other health care facility
located more than a fifteen-mile radius from the applying
facility.

SB 1268 7
12. When a [nursing] long-term care facility shifts
from a skilled to an intermediate level of nursing care, it
may return to the higher level of care if it meets the
licensure requirements, without obtaining a certificate of
need.
13. In no event shall a certificate of need be denied
because the applicant refuses to provide abortion services
or information.
14. A certificate of need shall not be required for
the transfer of ownership of an existing and operational
health facility in its entirety.
15. A certificate of need may be granted to a facility
for an expansion, an addition of services, or a new
institutional service[, or for a new hospital facility
which] that provides for something less than that which was
sought in the application.
16. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
facilities operated by the state, and appropriation of funds
to such facilities by the general assembly shall be deemed
in compliance with this section, and such facilities shall
be deemed to have received an appropriate certificate of
need without payment of any fee or charge. The provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to hospitals offering
long-term care services operated by the state and licensed
under this chapter, except for department of mental health
state-operated psychiatric hospitals.
17. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section,
a certificate of need may be issued after July 1, 1983, for
an intermediate care facility operated exclusively for the
intellectually disabled.
[18. To assure the safe, appropriate, and cost-
effective transfer of new medical technology throughout the

SB 1268 8
state, a certificate of need shall not be required for the
purchase and operation of:
(1) Research equipment that is to be used in a
clinical trial that has received written approval from a
duly constituted institutional review board of an accredited
100 school of medicine or osteopathy located in Missouri to
101 establish its safety and efficacy and does not increase the
102 bed complement of the institution in which the equipment is
103 to be located. After the clinical trial has been completed,
104 a certificate of need must be obtained for continued use in
105 such facility; or
106 (2) Equipment that is to be used by an academic health
107 center operated by the state in furtherance of its research
108 or teaching missions.]
197.320. The committee shall have the power to
promulgate reasonable rules, regulations, criteria and
standards in conformity with this section and chapter 536 to
meet the objectives of sections 197.300 to [197.366] 197.367
including the power to establish criteria and standards to
review new types of [equipment or service] services. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in sections 197.300 to [197.366] 197.367 shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. All rulemaking authority delegated prior to
August 28, 1999, is of no force and effect and repealed.
Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to repeal or
affect the validity of any rule filed or adopted prior to
August 28, 1999, if it fully complied with all applicable
provisions of law. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the

SB 1268 9
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 1999, shall be invalid and void.
354.095. 1. A corporation subject to the provisions
of sections 354.010 to 354.380 may, in the discretion of its
board of directors, limit or define the classes of persons
who shall be eligible to become members or beneficiaries,
limit and define the benefits which it will furnish, and may
define such benefits as it undertakes to furnish into
classes or kinds. It may make available to its members or
beneficiaries such health services, or reimbursement
therefor, as the board of directors of any such corporation
may approve; if maternity benefits are provided to any
members of any plan, then maternity benefits shall be
provided to any member of such plan without discrimination
as to whether the member is married or unmarried, and if
maternity benefits are provided to a beneficiary of any
plan, then maternity benefits shall be provided to such
beneficiary of such plan without discrimination as to
whether the beneficiary is married or unmarried.
2. [If an ambulatory surgical facility as defined by
subdivision (2) of section 197.200, has received a
certificate of need as provided in chapter 197,] A health
services corporation shall provide benefits to [the
facility] an ambulatory surgical center, as defined by
section 197.200, on the same basis as it does to all other
health care facilities, whether contracting members or
noncontracting members. A health services corporation shall
use the same standards that are applied to any other health
care facility within the same health services area in

SB 1268 10
defining the benefits that the corporation will furnish to
the ambulatory surgical facility, the classes to which such
benefits will be furnished, and the amount of reimbursement.
[197.366. The term "health care
facilities" in sections 197.300 to 197.366 shall
mean:
(1) Facilities licensed under chapter 198;
(2) Long-term care beds in a hospital as
described in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of
section 198.012;
(3) Long-term care hospitals or beds in a
long-term care hospital meeting the requirements
described in 42 CFR, section 412.23(e); and
(4) Construction of a new hospital as
defined in chapter 197.]
✓